apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <!-- beszéd : beszédek : beszéddel : beszédet : beszéde -->
    <pardef n="beszéd__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>del</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ében</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- gyerek : gyerekek : guereket -->
   <pardef n="gyerek__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>re</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ekben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>eket</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>eknek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>eken</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>eknél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ekbe</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ekre</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ét</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cink__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>je</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jük</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- adat : adattal : adatok : adata -->
  <pardef n="adat__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>okban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <!-- pont : pontja -->
  <pardef n="pont__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>jához</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <!-- ember : embert : emberrel : emberek : embere -->
    <pardef n="ember__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>rel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="adat"><i>adat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajánlat"><i>ajánlat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alakzat"><i>alakzat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="állat"><i>állat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="állcsont"><i>állcsont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apatit"><i>apatit</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áramlat"><i>áramlat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árrendszer"><i>árrendszer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bámulat"><i>bámulat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bánat"><i>bánat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bárpult"><i>bárpult</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bejárat"><i>bejárat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bér"><i>bér</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beszéd"><i>beszéd</i><par n="beszéd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bizonylat"><i>bizonylat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bocsánat"><i>bocsánat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boltozat"><i>boltozat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bombaszt"><i>bombaszt</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bridzs"><i>bridzs</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bűnbocsánat"><i>bűnbocsánat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bűntudat"><i>bűntudat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cink"><i>cink</i><par n="cink__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csábszer"><i>csábszer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csecs"><i>csecs</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cseled"><i>cseled</i><par n="beszéd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cserkészcsapat"><i>cserkészcsapat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csillagászat"><i>csillagászat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csodálat"><i>csodálat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="darabont"><i>darabont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dinamométer"><i>dinamométer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dísz"><i>dísz</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éj"><i>éj</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elvbarát"><i>elvbarát</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ember"><i>ember</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enyv"><i>enyv</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ezredmilliméter"><i>ezredmilliméter</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="férc"><i>férc</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fitty"><i>fitty</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="főnővér"><i>főnővér</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forgókorlát"><i>forgókorlát</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gríz"><i>gríz</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyepűrendszer"><i>gyepűrendszer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gyümölcsfagylalt"><i>gyümölcsfagylalt</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hidegvér"><i>hidegvér</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hit"><i>hit</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="időpont"><i>időpont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="intézményrendszer"><i>intézményrendszer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="javallat"><i>javallat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="javaslat"><i>javaslat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jóember"><i>jóember</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kegy"><i>kegy</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kilowatt"><i>kilowatt</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiscímer"><i>kiscímer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="központ"><i>központ</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="léc"><i>léc</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lecsapószer"><i>lecsapószer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="méh"><i>méh</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metszőpont"><i>metszőpont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minimálbér"><i>minimálbér</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nehézfegyver"><i>nehézfegyver</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pakombart"><i>pakombart</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pénzrendszer"><i>pénzrendszer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perc"><i>perc</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="priccs"><i>priccs</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ragasztószer"><i>ragasztószer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="restaurant"><i>restaurant</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="segéd"><i>segéd</i><par n="beszéd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skicc"><i>skicc</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szakember"><i>szakember</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szatócsbolt"><i>szatócsbolt</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szék"><i>szék</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szkeccs"><i>szkeccs</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="télikabát"><i>télikabát</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tett"><i>tett</i><par n="gyerek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="többpártrendszer"><i>többpártrendszer</i><par n="ember__n"/></e>
    <e lm="végpont"><i>végpont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kút"><i>kút</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
